Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 11 Form and Effect of Conveyances
34-11-36.
Defective acknowledgments.

Any acknowledgment of or upon any instrument used in conveying, directly or indirectly, any interest in real estate in this state, including power of attorney, where the instrument has been on record for a period of ten (10) years, shall be construed to be a valid acknowledgment in accordance with the requirements of chapter 12 of this title; provided, nevertheless, that if, within the period of ten (10) years, a proceeding is commenced in superior court relative to the validity of the acknowledgment, and a notice of lis pendens is duly recorded and indexed with the appropriate records of land evidence, the instrument shall be subject to the further order of the court involved in any such proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 147, § 1.

34-11-37.
Indefinite references to “trustee”.

The word “trustee” or the words “as trustee” or words of similar meaning, following the name of the grantee of real estate or any interest therein conveyed, transferred or assigned by an instrument duly executed and recorded, wherein the instrument fails to set forth the terms of the trust, or to specify a recorded instrument which sets forth its terms and the place in the public records where the instrument is recorded, shall not affect the right of such grantee to sell or otherwise dispose of the real estate or interest therein in the same manner as if the word “trustee” or the words “as trustee” had not been used in the instrument, and any person to whom the real estate or interest therein has been transferred by the grantee shall not be liable for the claim of any undisclosed beneficiary or for the application of any money which may have been paid by the person therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 254, § 1.

34-11-38.
Rule against perpetuities reform.

The common law rule against perpetuities shall no longer be deemed to be in force and/or of any effect in this state, provided, the provisions of this section shall not be construed to invalidate or modify the terms of any interest which would have been valid prior to the effective date of this act, and, provided further, that the provisions of this section shall apply to both legal and equitable interests.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 403, § 1.

34-11-39.
Penalty for sale of lands in West Warwick subject to sewer assessment.

Whoever, being the owner, or agent of the owner, of any property located in West Warwick which is or may be subject to a sewer assessment, transfers, sells, or negotiates to sell any land without a written disclosure contained in the purchaser’s sales agreement to the effect that all or part of the land has been so previously determined to be subject to a sewer assessment by the town of West Warwick shall be subject to a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each lot or part thereof so transferred, sold, or negotiated for sale without written disclosure. The disclosure shall indicate that sewer assessments in the town are assessed according to the value of the land rather than by a flat fee per lot or by the frontage of any lot. The purchaser may recover the penalty by civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 32, § 1.

34-11-40.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 59, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 425, § 7, effective June 1, 1993.

34-11-41.
Reimposition of restrictive covenants.

The mere recital in a deed or other instrument of conveyance to the effect that the conveyance is subject to restrictive covenants or other restrictions shall not operate to impose, reimpose, or recreate the restrictive covenants or other restrictions which have expired according to their terms or which have ceased to be valid and operative by virtue of the provisions of §

34-4-21

, unless the intent to make the imposition, reimposition, or recreation is expressly stated in the instrument of conveyance, or unless the instrument whereby the restrictive covenants or other restrictions were created provides for automatic renewal or extension of the covenants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 359, § 1.

34-11-42.
Transfer fees prohibited.

No person or business entity who sells real property shall charge, collect, receive, or be entitled to a fee based solely on the subsequent resale or transfer of said property. This prohibition includes, but is not limited to, fees or charges imposed by a real estate developer based upon the subsequent resale or transfer of said real property. Any housing development that is covered by the definition in §

45-53-3(9)

is exempt from this section. Further, any fee or charge connected with the transfer of properties with a conservation restriction as defined in §

34-39-2(a)

is exempt from the provisions of this section. Further, community associations, including, but not limited to, condominium associations, homeowners associations and cooperative associations, are exempt from this section. Any covenant recorded on or after July 1, 2012, imposing any charge or fee inconsistent with this section shall be void and unenforceable against any subsequent owner, purchaser or mortgagee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 286, § 1.

34-11-43.
Effect of special warranty deed.

A deed entitled “special warranty deed” shall, when duly executed, have the force and effect of a deed in fee simple to the grantee and his or her heirs and assigns, to his, her, and their own use, with covenants on the part of the grantor, for himself or herself and for his or her heirs, executors, and administrators, with the grantee and his or her heirs and assigns, that he or she will, and his or her heirs, executors, and administrators shall, warrant and defend the granted premises to the grantee and his or her heirs and assigns forever against the lawful claims and demands of all persons claiming by, through, or under the grantor.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 122, § 1.

34-11-44.
Meaning of special warranty covenants.

In any deed of conveyance of real estate, the use of the words “special warranty” in the title of said deed, and/or use of the words “special warranty covenants” in the body of said deed shall have the full force, meaning, and effect of the following words: “The grantor, for himself or herself and for his or her heirs, executors and administrators, covenants with the grantee and his or her heirs and assigns, that he or she will, and his or her heirs, executors, and administrators shall, warrant and defend the granted premises to the grantee and his or her heirs and assigns forever against the lawful claims and demands of all persons claiming, by, through, or under the grantor.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 122, § 1.